District of Columbia statutes.
8-1778.29

Information reporting.

Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the issuance of the bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the Council.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-183, § 209, 57 DCR 3406

History

Section 110 of D.C. Law 18-156 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 110. Information reporting. Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the issuance of the bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the Council.”
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 18-156 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 110 of Energy Efficiency Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-324, March 1, 2010, 57 DCR 1851).

Emergency Legislation